District of Columbia statutes.
16-546

Attachments of credits.

An attachment shall be levied upon credits of the defendant, in the hands of a garnishee, by serving the garnishee with a copy of the writ of attachment and of the interrogatories accompanying the writ, and a notice that any property or credits of the defendant in his hands are seized by virtue of the attachment.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-548.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-546.
1973 Ed., § 16-546.